Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.015

Certain powers and duties of director of public institutions transferred to director of financial institutions.

The director of financial institutions shall have the power and duties of the director of public institutions contained in the following chapters of RCW: Chapter 33.04 RCW concerning savings and loan associations; and chapter 39.32 RCW concerning purchase of federal property.

[ 1994 c 92 s 495; 1984 c 29 s 2; 1983 c 3 s 101; 1981 c 115 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.015. Prior: 1955 c 285 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 115: See note following RCW 40.14.020.